Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3896
(UTC 1007) Event affecting administration or distribution.

(UTC 1007) If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee's lack of knowledge.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 96.